Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.200

Master list of high school courses qualifying for postsecondary credit and qualifying examination scores—Publication on website.

The council shall annually publish on its website the agreed-upon list of high school courses qualifying for postsecondary credit under RCW 28B.10.053 and qualifying examination scores and demonstrated competencies meeting the postsecondary requirements for a certificate or technical degree, a two-year academic transfer degree, or the lower division requirements for a baccalaureate degree.

[ 2012 c 229 s 112; 2011 c 77 s 4. Formerly RCW 28B.76.235.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2011 c 77: See notes following RCW 28A.230.130.